Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2289.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 34-37-3 and 34-37-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 34-37 entitled
"Rhode Island Fair Housing Practices Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
34-37-3. Definitions.
When used in this chapter:
(1) “Age” means anyone over the age of eighteen (18).
(2) “Armed forces” means the Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Coast Guard, Merchant
Marines, Space Force, or Air Force of the United States and the Rhode Island National Guard.
(3) “Commission” means the Rhode Island commission for human rights created by § 28-
5-8.
(4) “Disability” means a disability as defined in § 42-87-1.
Provided, further, that the term “disability” does not include current, illegal use of, or
addiction to, a controlled substance, as defined in 21 U.S.C. § 802.
(5) “Discriminate” includes segregate, separate, or otherwise differentiate between or
among individuals because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or
expression, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable
discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces,
country of ancestral origin, disability, age, housing status, or familial status or because of the race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, lawful source
of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general

administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability,
age, housing status, or familial status of any person with whom they are, or may wish to be,
associated.
(6) The term “domestic abuse” for the purposes of this chapter shall have the same meaning
as that set forth in § 15-15-1 and include all forms of domestic violence as set forth in § 12-29-2,
except that the domestic abuse need not involve a minor or parties with minor children.
(7) “Emotional support animal” means a dog or cat that provides emotional, cognitive, or
other similar support to an individual with a disability, and does not need to be trained or certified.
Any animal not a dog or cat shall not be considered an emotional support animal for purposes of
this chapter.
(7)(8)(i) “Familial status” means one or more individuals who have not attained the age of
eighteen (18) years being domiciled with:
(A) A parent or another person having legal custody of the individual or individuals; or
(B) The designee of the parent or other person having the custody, with the written
permission of the parent or other person, provided that, if the individual is not a relative or legal
dependent of the designee, that the individual shall have been domiciled with the designee for at
least six (6) months.
(ii) The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial status shall
apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual
who has not attained the age of eighteen (18) years.
(8)(9) The terms, as used regarding persons with disabilities, “auxiliary aids and services,”
“reasonable accommodation,” and “reasonable modifications” have the same meaning as those
terms are defined in § 42-87-1.1.
(9)(10) The term “gender identity or expression” includes a person’s actual or perceived
gender, as well as a person’s gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-related appearance,
or gender-related expression; whether or not that gender identity, gender-related self image, gender-
related appearance, or gender-related expression is different from that traditionally associated with
the person’s sex at birth.
(10)(11) “Housing accommodation” includes any building or structure, or portion of any
building or structure, or any parcel of land, developed or undeveloped, that is occupied or is
intended, designed, or arranged to be occupied, or to be developed for occupancy, as the home or
residence of one or more persons.
(11)(12) “Otherwise qualified” includes any person with a disability who, with respect to
the rental of property, personally or with assistance arranged by the person with a disability, is
LC003786 - Page 2 of 11

capable of performing all the responsibilities of a tenant as contained in § 34-18-24.
(12)(13) “Owner” includes any person having the right to sell, rent, lease, or manage a
housing accommodation.
(13)(14) “Person” includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations,
organizations, corporations, labor organizations, mutual companies, joint stock companies, trusts,
receivers, legal representatives, trustees, other fiduciaries, or real estate brokers or real estate
salespersons as defined in chapter 20.5 of title 5.
(14)(15) “Senior citizen” means a person sixty-two (62) years of age or older.
(16) “Service animal” means a dog that has been individually trained to do work or perform
tasks for an individual with disability; provided, the tasks performed by the dog are related to the
person’s disability.
(15)(17) The term “sexual orientation” means having, or being perceived as having, an
orientation for heterosexuality, bisexuality, or homosexuality.
(16)(18) The term “victim” means a family or household member and all other persons
contained within the definition of those terms as defined in § 12-29-2.
(17)(19) The term “housing status” means the status of having or not having a fixed or
regular residence, including the status of living on the streets or in a homeless shelter or similar
temporary residence.
(18)(20) The term “lawful source of income” means and includes any income, benefit, or
subsidy derived from child support; alimony; Social Security; Supplemental Security Income; any
other federal, state, or local public assistance program, including, but not limited to, medical or
veterans assistance; any federal, state, or local rental assistance or housing subsidy program,
including Section 8 Housing Choice Vouchers as authorized by 42 U.S.C. § 1437; and any
requirement associated with such public assistance, rental assistance, or housing subsidy program.
34-37-4. Unlawful housing practices.
(a) No owner having the right to sell, rent, lease, or manage a housing accommodation as
defined in § 34-37-3, or an agent of any of these, shall, directly or indirectly, make, or cause to be
made, any written or oral inquiry concerning the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation,
gender identity or expression, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran
with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember
in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, or disability, age, familial status nor make any
written or oral inquiry concerning whether a tenant or applicant or a member of the household is,
or has been, or is threatened with being the victim of domestic abuse, or whether a tenant or
applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief from any court in the form of a restraining
LC003786 - Page 3 of 11

order for protection from domestic abuse, of any prospective purchaser, occupant, or tenant of the
housing accommodation; directly or indirectly, refuse to sell, rent, lease, let, or otherwise deny to
or withhold from any individual the housing accommodation because of the race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, lawful source of income,
military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative
discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, or
familial status of the individual or the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity
or expression, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable
discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces,
country of ancestral origin or disability, age, or familial status of any person with whom the
individual is or may wish to be associated; or shall, or on the basis that a tenant or applicant, or a
member of the household, is or has been, or is threatened with being, the victim of domestic abuse,
or that the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking, relief from any court in the
form of a restraining order for protection from domestic abuse. Nor shall an owner having the right
to sell, rent, lease, or manage a housing accommodation as defined in § 34-37-3, or an agent of any
of these, directly or indirectly, issue any advertisement relating to the sale, rental, or lease of the
housing accommodation that indicates any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination
based upon race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital
status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an
honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of
ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or on the basis that a tenant or applicant or a member
of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the victim of domestic abuse, or that
the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief from any court in the form of a
restraining order for protection from domestic abuse, or shall, directly or indirectly, discriminate
against any individual because of his or her race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an
honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the
armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or on the basis that a tenant
or applicant or a member of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the victim of
domestic abuse, or that the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief from any
court in the form of a restraining order for protection from domestic abuse, in the terms, conditions,
or privileges of the sale, rental, or lease of any housing accommodation or in the furnishing of
facilities or services in connection with it. Nor shall an owner having the right to sell, rent, lease,
or manage a housing accommodation as defined in § 34-37-3, or an agent of any of these, directly
LC003786 - Page 4 of 11

or indirectly, misrepresent the availability of a housing accommodation or delay the processing of
applications relating to the sale, rental, or lease of the housing accommodation based upon an
individual’s race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital
status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an
honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of
ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or on the basis that a tenant or applicant or a member
of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the victim of domestic abuse, or that
the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief from any court in the form of a
restraining order for protection from domestic abuse.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any oral or written inquiry as to
whether the prospective purchaser or tenant is eighteen (18) years of age or older, or to confirm the
source, amount, and expected duration of the lawful source of income of the prospective purchaser
or tenant to determine whether the prospective purchaser or tenant meets the nondiscriminatory
standards and preferences or terms, conditions, limitations, or specifications permitted under
subsection (c) of this section.
(b) No person to whom application is made for a loan or other form of financial assistance
for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair, or maintenance of any housing
accommodation, whether secured or unsecured, shall directly or indirectly make or cause to be
made any written or oral inquiry concerning the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender
identity or expression, marital status, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an
honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of
ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or any express written or oral inquiry into whether
a tenant or applicant or a member of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the
victim of domestic abuse, or whether a tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking
relief from any court in the form of a restraining order for protection from domestic abuse, of any
individual seeking the financial assistance, or of existing or prospective occupants or tenants of the
housing accommodation; nor shall any person to whom the application is made in the manner
provided, directly or indirectly, discriminate in the terms, conditions, or privileges relating to the
obtaining or use of any financial assistance against any applicant because of the race, color, religion,
sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, military status as a veteran
with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember
in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or on the basis that
a tenant or applicant or a member of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the
victim of domestic abuse, or that the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief
LC003786 - Page 5 of 11

from any court in the form of a restraining order for protection from domestic abuse, of the applicant
or of the existing or prospective occupants or tenants. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed
to prohibit any written or oral inquiry as to whether the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18).
(c) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed in any manner to prohibit or limit
the exercise of the privilege of every person and the agent of any person having the right to sell,
rent, lease, or manage a housing accommodation to establish standards and preferences and set
terms, conditions, limitations, or specifications in the selling, renting, leasing, or letting thereof or
in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection therewith that do not discriminate on the
basis of the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital
status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an
honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces, country of
ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or on the basis that a tenant or applicant or a member
of the household is, or has been, or is threatened with being the victim of domestic abuse, or that
the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or is seeking relief from any court in the form of a
restraining order for protection from domestic abuse, of any prospective purchaser, lessee, tenant,
or occupant thereof or on the race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or
expression, marital status, lawful source of income, military status as a veteran with an honorable
discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge, servicemember in the armed forces,
country of ancestral origin, disability, age, or familial status of any person with whom the
prospective purchaser, lessee, tenant, or occupant is or may wish to be associated. Nothing
contained in this section shall be construed in any manner to prohibit or limit the exercise of the
privilege of every person and the agent of any person making loans for, or offering financial
assistance in, the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair, or maintenance of housing
accommodations to set standards and preferences, terms, conditions, limitations, or specifications
for the granting of loans or financial assistance that do not discriminate on the basis of the race,
color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, military status
as a veteran with an honorable discharge or an honorable or general administrative discharge,
servicemember in the armed forces, country of ancestral origin, disability, age, familial status, or
on the basis that a tenant or applicant or a member of the household is, or has been, or is threatened
with being the victim of domestic abuse, or that the tenant or applicant has obtained, or sought, or
is seeking relief from any court in the form of a restraining order for protection from domestic
abuse, of the applicant for the loan or financial assistance or of any existing or prospective owner,
lessee, tenant, or occupant of the housing accommodation. If a landlord requires that a prospective
or current tenant have a certain minimum level of income, the standard for assessing eligibility
LC003786 - Page 6 of 11

shall be based only on the portion of the rent to be paid by the tenant, taking into account the value
of any federal, state, or local rental assistance or housing subsidy.
(d) An owner may not refuse to allow a person with a disability to make, at his or her
expense, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by the person if
the modifications may be necessary to afford the person full enjoyment of the premises, except that,
in the case of a rental, the owner may, where it is reasonable to do so, condition permission for a
modification on the renter agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that
existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted. Where it is necessary in order
to ensure with reasonable certainty that funds will be available to pay for the restorations at the end
of the tenancy, the landlord may negotiate as part of the restoration agreement a provision requiring
that the tenant pay into an interest bearing escrow account, over a reasonable period, a reasonable
amount of money not to exceed the cost of the restorations. The interest in the account shall accrue
to the benefit of the tenant. The restoration deposition shall be exempt from § 34-18-19(a) but will
be subject to § 34-18-19(b) through (f) inclusive.
(e)(1) An owner may not refuse to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies,
practices, or services when those accommodations may be necessary to afford an occupant with a
disability equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling.
(2) Every person with a disability who has a guide dog or other personal assistive service
animal, or who obtains a guide dog or other personal assistive service animal, shall be entitled to
full and equal access to all housing accommodations provided for in this section and shall not be
required to pay extra compensation for the guide dog or other personal assistive service animal but
shall be liable for any damage done to the premises by a guide dog or other personal assistive the
service animal. For the purposes of this subsection, a “personal assistive animal” is an animal
specifically trained by a certified animal training program to assist a person with a disability to
perform independent living tasks.
(3)(i) A tenant with a disability or disability-related need for an emotional support animal
may request and be approved by a landlord to keep an emotional support animal as a reasonable
accommodation in housing.
(ii) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, rule, or regulation, a landlord may deny a
reasonable accommodation request for an emotional support animal if the animal poses a direct
threat to the safety or health of others or poses a direct threat of physical damage to the property
that cannot be reduced or eliminated by another reasonable accommodation, or if allowing the
animal to be kept on the premises would result in the cancellation of the property insurance or a
substantial increase of the insurance premiums.
LC003786 - Page 7 of 11

(iii) If a tenant’s disability-related need for an emotional support animal is not readily
apparent, the landlord may request supporting documentation that reasonably supports the tenant’s
need for the particular emotional support animal. Supporting documentation may consist of
documentation from a healthcare practitioner who has personal knowledge of the tenant’s disability
and is acting within the scope of the practitioner’s practice, and identifies the particular assistance
or therapeutic value provided by the animal.
(iv) Subject to the provisions of subsection (e)(3)(ii) of this section, no landlord shall
prohibit the keeping of an emotional support animal on the rented premises if:
(A) The documentation supporting the tenant's need for the emotional support animal
comes from a Rhode Island licensed healthcare practitioner; and
(B) The healthcare practitioner has a physical office located within the State of Rhode
Island; and
(C) The healthcare practitioner has provided a clinical evaluation of the individual
regarding the need for the emotional support animal; and
(D) The healthcare practitioner has established a patient-practitioner relationship for at
least thirty (30) days prior to providing the documentation requested regarding the individual’s
need for an emotional support animal; and
(E) The healthcare practitioner has made a written affirmation of the supporting
documentation in this subsection under the pains and penalties of perjury.
(v) A tenant with a disability-related need for an emotional support animal is liable for any
damage done to the premises or to another person on the premises by the tenant's emotional support
animal.
(f) Any housing accommodation of four (4) units or more constructed for first occupancy
after March 13, 1991, shall be designed and constructed in such a manner that:
(1) The public use and common use portions of the dwellings are readily accessible to and
usable by persons with disabilities;
(2) All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises within the
dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by persons with disabilities in wheelchairs;
(3) All premises within the dwellings contain the following features of adaptive design:
(i) Accessible route into and through the dwelling;
(ii) Light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental controls in
accessible locations;
(iii) Reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and
(iv) Usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can maneuver
LC003786 - Page 8 of 11

about the space. To the extent that any state or local building codes, statutes, or ordinances are
inconsistent with this section, they are hereby repealed. The state building code standards
committee is hereby directed to adopt rules and regulations consistent with this section as soon as
possible, but no later than September 30, 1990.
(g) Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the state building code 14
“accessibility for individuals with disabilities for residential use groups” suffices to satisfy the
requirements of subsection (f) of this section.
(h) As used in subsection (f) of this section, the term “housing accommodation of four (4)
units or more” means:
(1) Buildings consisting of four (4) or more units if those buildings have one or more
elevators; and
(2) Ground floor units in other buildings consisting of four (4) or more units.
(i) Nothing in subsection (f) of this section shall be construed to limit any law, statute, or
regulation that requires a greater degree of accessibility to persons with disabilities.
(j) Nothing in this section requires that a dwelling be made available to an individual whose
tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy
would result in substantial physical damage to the property of others.
(k) Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit an owner, lessee,
sublessee, or assignee from advertising or selecting a person of the same or opposite gender to rent,
lease, or share the housing unit that the owner, lessee, sublessee, or assignee will occupy with the
person selected.
(l) No person shall aid, abet, incite, compel, or coerce the doing of any act declared by this
section to be an unlawful housing practice; or obstruct or prevent any person from complying with
the provisions of this chapter or any order issued thereunder; or attempt directly or indirectly to
commit any act declared by this section to be an unlawful housing practice.
(m) No owner; person defined in § 34-37-3(13); person to whom application is made for a
loan or other form of financial assistance for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair, or
maintenance of any housing accommodation, whether secured or unsecured; no financial
organization governed by the provisions of title 19 or any other credit-granting commercial
institution; or respondent under this chapter; or any agent of these shall discriminate in any manner
against any individual because he or she has opposed any practice forbidden by this chapter, or
because he or she has made a charge, testified, or assisted in any manner in any investigation,
proceeding, or hearing under this chapter.
(n) Nothing in this section shall prevent a landlord from proceeding with eviction action
LC003786 - Page 9 of 11

against a tenant who fails to comply with § 34-18-24(7).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003786
========
LC003786 - Page 10 of 11